Nebraska, session 109, LB524.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB524 LB524
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-8,112, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
79-8,112 The purpose of the Nebraska Teacher Recruitment and
Retention Act is to provide financial incentives to recruit and retain
teachers and paraeducators in Nebraska classrooms.
Sec. 2. Section 79-8,113, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-8,113 For purposes of the Nebraska Teacher Recruitment and
Retention Act:
(1) Department means the State Department of Education;
(2) Grant means a grant for teacher recruitment and retention
payments under the Nebraska Teacher Recruitment and Retention Act; and
(3) Paraeducator means an individual who is employed by a school in
Nebraska to provide instructional support and noninstructional services
to students and teachers in schools but who is not required to hold a
certificate to teach; and
(4) (3) Teacher means a person who holds a valid certificate to
teach in Nebraska issued by the Commissioner of Education and is employed
in Nebraska for the instruction of students in elementary or high school
grades.
Sec. 3. Section 79-8,114, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-8,114 (1) A teacher or paraeducator is eligible to receive a
grant as prescribed in this section may apply to the department for a
grant. The department shall not prioritize a grant based upon the school
where the teacher or paraeducator is employed applicant teaches. The
department shall distribute all grants automatically to the school
district employing the eligible teacher or paraeducator. The school
district shall distribute such grant funds to the teacher or paraeducator
in accordance with this section.
(2) A teacher is eligible to receive apply for:
-2-

LB524 LB524
2025 2025
(a) A retention one grant of two thousand five hundred dollars if
the teacher has signed a contract to complete such teacher's second
complete school year of full-time employment as a teacher at a Nebraska
school in school year 2023-24, 2024-25, 2025-26, or 2026-27;
(b) A retention two grant of two thousand five hundred dollars if
the teacher has signed a contract to complete such teacher's fourth
complete school year of full-time employment as a teacher at a Nebraska
school in school year 2023-24, 2024-25, 2025-26, or 2026-27;
(c) A retention three grant of two thousand five hundred dollars if
the teacher has signed a contract to complete such teacher's sixth
complete school year of full-time employment as a teacher at a Nebraska
school in school year 2023-24, 2024-25, 2025-26, or 2026-27; and
(d)(i) A high-need retention grant of five thousand dollars if on or
after June 2, 2023, a teacher:
(A) Obtains an endorsement in special education, mathematics,
science, technology, or dual credit; and
(B)(I) For an application submitted prior to April 17, 2024, signs a
contract to complete a school year of full-time employment as a teacher
at a Nebraska school in school year 2024-25, 2025-26, or 2026-27; or
(II) For an application submitted on or after April 17, 2024, signs
a contract to complete a school year of full-time employment as a teacher
to teach in such endorsement area at a Nebraska school in school year
2024-25, 2025-26, or 2026-27.
(ii) A teacher shall only be eligible to receive one high-need
retention grant.
(3) A paraeducator is eligible to receive:
(a) A retention grant of one thousand dollars if such paraeducator
signs a contract to work as a paraeducator and works on average twenty-
eight hours or more per week during the school year in school year
2025-26 or 2026-27; and
(b) A retention grant in an amount proportional to the grant
-3-

LB524 LB524
2025 2025
provided in subdivision (a) of this subsection based on the actual number
of hours worked if such paraeducator signs a contract to work as a
paraeducator and works on average less than twenty-eight hours per week
during the school year in school year 2025-26 or 2026-27.
Sec. 4. Section 79-8,115, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-8,115 It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage individual
schools and school districts to adopt policies incentivizing teacher and
paraeducator recruitment and retention through policies similar to the
Nebraska Teacher Recruitment and Retention Act. Teachers and
paraeducators at schools not adopting a recruitment and retention policy
shall not be prohibited from receiving a grant under the Nebraska Teacher
Recruitment and Retention Act.
Sec. 5. Section 79-1021, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1021 (1) The Education Future Fund is created. The fund shall be
administered by the department and shall consist of money transferred to
the fund by the Legislature. Transfers may be made from the Education
Future Fund to the Computer Science and Technology Education Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Education Future Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The fund shall be used only for the following purposes, in order
of priority:
(a) To fully fund equalization aid under the Tax Equity and
Educational Opportunities Support Act;
(b) To fund reimbursements related to special education under
section 79-1142;
(c) To fund foundation aid under the Tax Equity and Educational
Opportunities Support Act;
-4-

LB524 LB524
2025 2025
(d) To increase funding for school districts in a way that results
in direct property tax relief, which means a dollar-for-dollar
replacement of property taxes by a state funding source;
(e) To provide funding for a grant program created by the
Legislature to address teacher and paraeducator turnover rates and keep
existing teachers and paraeducators in classrooms;
(f) To provide funding to increase career and technical educational
classroom opportunities for students, including, but not limited to,
computer science education. Such funding must provide students with the
academic and technical skills, knowledge, and training necessary to
succeed in future careers;
(g) To provide funding for a grant program created by the
Legislature to provide students the opportunity to have a mentor who will
continuously engage with the student directly to aid in the student's
professional growth and give ongoing support and encouragement to the
student;
(h) To provide funding for extraordinary increases in special
education expenditures to allow school districts with large, unexpected
special education expenditures to more easily meet the needs of all
students;
(i) To provide funding to help recruit teachers throughout the state
by utilizing apprenticeships through a teacher apprenticeship program and
an alternative certification process;
(j) To provide funding to develop and implement a professional
learning system to help provide sustained professional learning and
training regarding evidence-based reading instruction and for a grant
program relating to dyslexia research; and
(k) To provide funding for a pilot project administered by the State
Department of Education to provide menstrual products to school
districts.
(3)(a) The State Treasurer shall transfer one billion dollars from
-5-

LB524 LB524
2025 2025
the General Fund to the Education Future Fund in fiscal year 2023-24, on
such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of
the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(b) The State Treasurer shall transfer two hundred fifty million
dollars from the General Fund to the Education Future Fund in fiscal year
2024-25, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that two hundred fifty
million dollars be transferred from the General Fund to the Education
Future Fund in fiscal year 2025-26 and each fiscal year thereafter.
Sec. 6. Original sections 79-8,112, 79-8,113, 79-8,114, 79-8,115,
and 79-1021, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 7. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-6-